Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2629.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 616.1(c)(6) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended to read:Section 616.1. Enforcement Notice.--* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 (c) An enforcement notice shall state at least the following:* * *(6) That failure to comply with the notice within the time specified, unless extended by appeal to the zoning hearing board, constitutes a violation[, with possible sanctions clearly described.] and that, if applicable, an additional penalty may accrue for each successive day of the violation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2629PN3589 - 2 - 1234567891011